Utah statutes.
62A-6-112.   Jury -- Rules of evidence -- Transcript -- Burden of proof.

(1)  The petitioner is entitled to request a jury to hear the petition. The rules of evidence apply in any hearing on a petition for sterilization. A transcript shall be made of the hearing and shall be made a permanent part of the record.

(2)  The burden of producing evidence and the burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the petition for or order authorizing sterilization should be granted.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

